Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Article 1. General Provisions.

§§ 77-9-1 and 77-9-3.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 460, §§ 1, 2, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§77-9-1. [Codes, 1892, § 4331; 1906, § 4885; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7672; 1930, § 7044; 1942, § 7820; Laws, 1908, ch. 82.]

§77-9-3. [Codes, 1892, § 4332; 1906, § 4886; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7673; 1930, § 7045; 1942, § 7821; Laws, 1908, ch. 83; 1984, ch. 512, § 1]

§ 77-9-5.
“Railroad,” “company” and “commission” defined.

The term “railroad” as used in this chapter, includes and applies to every person, firm, association of persons, and company, whether incorporated or not, who or which shall own or operate a railroad as a common carrier.

The term “company” as used in this chapter, embraces and applies to every person, firm, association of persons, and company, whether incorporated or not, who or which shall own or operate a telegraph or telephone line, or do an express or sleeping car business.

The term “commission,” as used in this chapter, means the Mississippi Transportation Commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4336; 1906, § 4891; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7677; 1930, § 7046; 1942, § 7822; Laws, 1908, ch. 87; Laws, 2018, ch. 332, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved March 8, 2018).

§ 77-9-7.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1984, ch. 512, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

[Codes, 1906, § 4892; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7678; 1930, § 7047; 1942, § 7823; Laws, 1898, ch. 82; 1908, ch. 87]

§§ 77-9-9 and 77-9-11.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 460, §§ 3, 4, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§77-9-9. [Codes, 1892, § 4325; 1906, § 4879; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7664; 1930, § 7056; 1942, § 7832]

§77-9-11. [Codes, 1892, §§ 4290, 4291; 1906, §§ 4842, 4843; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 7627, 7628; 1930, §§ 7095, 7096; 1942, §§ 7871, 7872]

§ 77-9-13.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 72, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

[Codes, 1892, § 4292; 1906, § 4844; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7629; 1930, § 6141; 1942, § 7793; Laws, 1916, ch. 233; 1940, ch. 164]

§ 77-9-15.
Penalty.

If any common carrier shall give to any person a free pass or ticket, or transport him free of charge, contrary to law, such common carrier shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not less than fifty dollars.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 7553; 1930, § 6143; 1942, § 7795; Laws, 1916, ch. 132; Laws, 1940, ch. 164.

§§ 77-9-17 through 77-9-25.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 460, § 5-9, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§77-9-17. [Codes, 1892, § 4323; 1906, § 4877; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7662; 1930, § 7055; 1942, § 7831; Laws, 1928, ch. 204]

§77-9-19. [Codes, 1892, § 4296; 1906, § 4848; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7633; 1930, § 7101; 1942, § 7877]

§77-9-21. [Codes, 1892, § 4283; 1906, § 4835; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7620; 1930, § 7039; 1942, § 7816]

§77-9-23. [Codes, 1892, § 4281; 1906, § 4833; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7618; 1930, § 7032; 1942, § 7809; Laws, 1984, ch. 512, § 2]

§77-9-25. [Codes, 1892, § 4282; 1906, § 4834; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7619; 1930, § 7033; 1942, § 7810]

§ 77-9-27.
Surety bonds of employees shall not be required to be in any particular company.

No common carrier, authorized to do business in this state, when requiring of an employee that he give it a bond or undertaking of any nature whatever, shall require such employee to have such bond or undertaking executed as surety by any particular company, corporation, association, or firm, or by any one or more of any number of such companies, corporations, associations or firms named by such common carrier. No such common carrier shall reject any such bond or undertaking for any reason other than the financial insufficiency of such bond or undertaking.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 7707; 1930, § 7135; 1942, § 7894; Laws, 1914, ch. 152.

§ 77-9-29.
Sureties shall be authorized to do business in state.

No common carrier, authorized to do business in this state, when requiring of any employee that he give it a bond or undertaking of any nature, whatsoever, shall require as surety thereon any companies, corporations, associations or firms not a resident of this state. No such common carrier shall accept as such surety any company, corporation or association, unless the same is a corporation duly organized under the laws of Mississippi or which shall have designated an agent residing within this state upon whom service of legal process against it may be made, as provided for foreign corporations doing business in this state, and shall also require that every such bond or undertaking shall be approved, and cancelled, if cancelled, by said agent with whom a complete record thereof shall be kept.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 7708; 1930, § 7136; 1942, § 7895; Laws, 1914, ch. 152.

§ 77-9-31.
Bond shall cover definite term; cancellation of bond.

Every bond or undertaking of any nature whatsoever given by an employee of any common carrier authorized to do business in this state, shall be made to cover a definite term. No such bond or undertaking shall be cancelled without the consent of all parties thereto, except for a breach of one or more of the conditions thereof. Any such employee who shall have given any such bond or undertaking, shall, upon breach of any of the conditions thereof by the other party or parties thereto, have the power to cancel the same by giving the surety or sureties thereon and the common carrier for the benefit of whom the same shall have been made, at least ten (10) days’ notice in writing, setting out in full the reasons for cancelling the same. Said notice shall be signed by such employee sworn to by him in this state before an officer authorized to administer oaths. Any such notice to a company, corporation or association may be served by leaving the same with any person upon whom service of legal process upon such company, corporation or association may be had. Any surety on any such bond or undertaking, shall upon the breach of any of the conditions thereof by the common carrier employee for whom the same shall have been made, have power to cancel the same by giving such employee at least ten (10) days’ notice in writing, setting out in full the reasons for cancelling the same. The said notice shall be signed by an agent or manager of such surety, then a resident of this state, and then authorized to approve or disapprove similar bonds or undertakings for such surety, and shall be sworn to by the person signing the same in this state before an officer authorized to administer oaths. Nothing herein shall affect any right of action accruing to any person upon the breach of a contract.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 7709; 1930, § 7137; 1942, § 7896; Laws, 1914, ch. 152.

§ 77-9-33.
Penalty.

Any officer, agent, or representative of any company, corporation, association or firm, or any other person who shall violate any of the provisions of Sections 77-9-27 through 77-9-31, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) and by imprisonment in the county jail for a period of not less than thirty (30) days, nor more than one (1) year. Any bond, contract, or undertaking made in violation of said provisions shall be void.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 7710; 1930, § 7138; 1942, § 7897; Laws, 1914, ch. 152.

§ 77-9-35.
Liability of the last of several carriers.

If a common carrier receive freight for further transportation and delivery within this state from another carrier, on any contract, express or implied, for continuous carriage, and it arrive at the place of delivery in a broken or damaged condition, or some parts thereof be lost or destroyed, it is the duty of the last carrier to obtain and furnish to the consigneee or other person interested, on demand, true copies of all notations, exceptions, records, and memoranda entered on the books of each carrier touching the receipt, transfers, and handling of the freight while in transit. If such last carrier shall not so furnish the same within thirty (30) days after demand, it shall be presumed to have caused such damage, loss, or destruction. In case of damage, loss, or destruction of perishable goods, by reason of their nature, and of damage not discoverable by outward inspection, proof thereof shall be admissible.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4301; 1906, § 4853; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7638; 1930, § 7107; 1942, § 7882.

§ 77-9-37.
Settlement of claims for lost or damaged freight shall be within reasonable time.

Railroads, corporations and individuals engaged as common carriers in this state are required to settle all claims for lost or damaged freight which has been lost or damaged between two (2) given points on the same line or system, within sixty (60) days from the filing of written notice of the loss or damage with the agent at the point of destination. Where freight is handled by two (2) or more roads or systems of roads, and is lost or damaged, claims therefor shall be settled within ninety (90) days from the filing of written notice thereof with the agent by consignee at the point of destination. A common carrier failing to settle such claims as herein required shall be liable to the consignee for twenty-five dollars ($25.00) damages in each case, in addition to actual damages, all of which may be recovered in the same suit. This section shall only apply when the amount claimed is two hundred dollars ($200.00) or less.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 4070; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6699; 1930, § 7112; 1942, § 7887; Laws, 1904, ch. 152; Laws, 1908, ch. 196.

§ 77-9-39.
Sale of goods for transportation charges.

When the consignee or owner of any goods or articles transported on any railroad cannot be found or refuses to receive the same or pay the charges, or neglects to do so for a period of fifteen (15) days after notice addressed to the consignee and deposited in the post office, application may be made by the railroad company or its agent to a justice court judge for an order of sale. If it be made to appear that the goods have been transported by the company, and that the consignee or owner cannot be found, or refuses or neglects to pay the costs and charges of transportation, or to receive the goods, the judge shall issue an order directed to the sheriff, or any constable or marshal, directing the sale of the goods at public vendue, at such time as the judge may direct, and the payment out of the proceeds of the sale of the charges on such goods, and all costs which have accrued in procuring the order and making the sale. Should there be a balance left, it shall be paid into the county treasury. The owner of the goods may receive the same out of the treasury, on the order of the board of supervisors, if applied for within two (2) years, but not afterward. Perishable goods may be sold, according to the exigency, if not immediately called for and taken.

The owners of steamboats and other watercraft, and warehousemen, have the right to enforce charges for freight and storage in accordance with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, on goods which have been transported or stored by them where the consignee or owner cannot be found, or refuses or neglects to pay such charges.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, §§ 2108, 2109; 1906, §§ 2293, 2294; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 4682, 4683; 1930, §§ 7113, 7114; 1942, §§ 7888, 7889; Laws, 1888, p. 92; Laws, 1984, ch. 512, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 77-9-41.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 460, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

[Codes, 1892, § 4329; 1906, § 4883; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7670; 1930, § 7043; 1942, § 7819; Laws, 1908, ch. 81]